Washington statutes.
RCW 10.110.060

No changes to standard of care—Restraints on pregnant women or youth.

Nothing in this chapter changes the standards of care with regard to the use of restraints on pregnant women or youth in custody as codified in chapters 70.48 and 72.09 RCW.

[ 2015 c 267 s 5.]